Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 598.37, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 598.37 Name change. 1. a. Either party to a marriage may request as a part of the decree of dissolution or decree of annulment a change in the personâs name to either the name appearing on the personâs birth certificate or to the name the person had immediately prior to the marriage. b. If a party requests a name change other than to the name appearing on the personâs birth certificate or to the name the person had immediately prior to the marriage, the request shall be made under chapter 674 . House File 2720, p. 2 2. If a party requests a name change under subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , the court shall issue a separate document evidencing the name change. The document shall not contain any other information relating to the decree of dissolution or decree of annulment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2720, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor